Utah statutes.
77-17-10.   Court to determine law; the jury, the facts.

(1) In a jury trial, questions of law are to be determined by the court, questions of fact by the jury.

(2)  The jury may find a general verdict which includes questions of law as well as fact but they are bound to follow the law as stated by the court.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

